src/fst/compounding.lexc
! ========================= !
!! !!!Compounding morphology
! ========================= !


! Compounds

LEXICON R
!! !!!Lexicon @LEXNAME@ gets flags and sends compounds over to RReal
@P.CmpFrst.FALSE@@P.CmpPref.FALSE@@D.CmpLast.TRUE@@D.CmpNone.TRUE@@U.CmpNone.FALSE@@P.CmpOnly.TRUE@ RReal ; !!= @CODE@ are Flags to control compounding

LEXICON RReal
!! !!!Lexicon @LEXNAME@ is the lexicon for the Cmp tag and resending to N, A
 +Cmp#: Nouns ;         !!= * @CODE@ 
 +Cmp#: Adjectives ;   !!= * @CODE@ 
          R-    ;       !!= @CODE@ 

LEXICON R-
!! !!!Lexicon @LEXNAME@ for compounds with hyphen
 +Cmp#:%- Nouns ;   !!= @CODE@ 
 +Cmp#:%- Adjectives ;   !!= @CODE@ 

LEXICON RNum 
!! !!!Lexicon @LEXNAME@ for compounds numeral + noun
      +Use/SpellNoSugg+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#:-# Nouns ;  !!= @CODE@  For Num Cmp Noun, vi vil ikke ha Num Cmp Num
